Idaho, session 2025, H0438.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-1076, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-1076. LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES CENTRAL REGISTRY -- REPORTING
INFORMATION REQUIRED -- PENALTIES FOR FAILURE TO REPORT. (1) In addition to
the provisions applicable to local governmental entities found in section
67-450B, Idaho Code, the provisions of this section also apply to local
governmental entities. For purposes of section 67-1075, Idaho Code, and
this section, "local governmental entity" includes without limitation all
cities, counties, entities governed by chapter 20, title 50, Idaho Code,
authorities, and districts organized as separate legal and reporting enti-
ties under Idaho law and includes the councils, commissions, and boards as
appointed or elected and charged with fiscal management responsibilities of
the local governmental entity. If a local governmental entity is governed
by the provisions of section 33-701, Idaho Code, such entity is not required
to comply with the provisions of this section. The reporting provisions of
subsections (2) through (4) of this section shall apply to the Idaho housing
and finance association created pursuant to section 67-6202, Idaho Code.
(a) There is hereby established a central registry and reporting portal
(registry) on the state controller's website. The registry and report-
ing portal shall serve as the unified location for the reporting of and
access to administrative and financial information of local governmen-
tal entities in this state. Every local governmental entity must regis-
ter with the state registry.
(b) The county clerk must notify each local governmental entity of the
requirements of this section.
(c) Each year, according to the schedule set forth in the uniform ac-
counting manual for local governmental entities authorized under sec-
tion 67-1075, Idaho Code:
(i) The state tax commission must submit a list to the state con-
troller of all taxing districts within the state; and
(ii) The county clerk of each county must submit a list to the
state controller of all taxing districts in the county and any
other local governmental entities that are authorized to impose
fees or assessments or to receive property tax money within the
county.


(2) On or before December 1 of each year, every local governmental en-
tity must submit to the online central registry and reporting portal the fol-
lowing information:
(a) Administrative information:
(i) The terms of membership and appointing authority for the gov-
erning board member of the local governmental entity;
(ii) The official name, mailing address, and electronic mailing
address of the entity;
(iii) The fiscal year of the entity; and
(iv) Except for cities and counties, the section of Idaho Code un-
der which the entity was established, the date of establishment,
the establishing entity, and the statute or statutes under which
the entity operates, if different from the statute or statutes un-
der which the entity was established.
(b) Financial information:
(i) The most recent adopted budget of the entity;
(ii) An unaudited comparison of the budget to actual revenues and
expenditures for the most recently completed fiscal year;
(iii) The date of its last independent audit; and
(iv) Any other information required by the uniform accounting
manual for local governmental entities.
(c) Bonds or other debt obligation information:
(i) The cumulative dollar amount of all bonds or other debt obli-
gations issued or incurred by the entity; and
(ii) The average length of term of all bond issuances or other debt
obligations and the average interest rate of all bonds or other
debt obligations.
(3) Within five (5) days of submitting to the central registry the in-
formation required by this subsection, the local governing governmental en-
tity must notify the entity's appointing authority, if the entity has an ap-
pointing authority, that it has submitted such information.
(4) If any information provided by an entity as required by this
subsection section changes during the year, the entity must update its in-
formation on the registry within thirty (30) days of any such change.
(5) All reasonable fees, costs, and other expenses incurred assisting
local governmental entities in compiling the reporting information required
by this section may be charged by the county against the local governmental
entity requesting the county's service. An entity may request assistance
from the county to comply with provisions of this section, but the county
is under no obligation to provide such assistance. For purposes of this
section, reasonable fees and costs include but are not limited to the labor
costs, material costs, and copying costs incurred while assisting local gov-
ernmental entities to comply with this section. Such fees and costs may be
deducted from any distributions of taxes, fees, or assessments collected by
the county on behalf of the local governmental entity.
(6) Audits required by sections 67-450B, 67-450C, and 67-450D, Idaho
Code, will be submitted to the online portal and provided by the state con-
troller's office to the legislative services office.
(7) Notification, late fees, and penalties.


(a) If a local governmental entity fails to submit information required
by this section or submits noncompliant information required by this
section, the state controller must notify the entity immediately af-
ter the due date of the information that either the information was not
submitted in a timely manner or the information submitted was noncom-
pliant. The local governmental entity then has thirty (30) days from
the date of notice to submit the information or notify the state con-
troller that it will comply by a time certain. The state controller may
impose a late fee for each day over said thirty (30) days that the local
governmental entity has failed to provide the information required un-
der this section. The late fee may be in the amount of up to five hundred
dollars ($500) per day and is immediately payable from the local govern-
mental entity to the state controller's office, which shall deposit the
fee in the state general fund.
(b) No later than January 15 of any year, the state controller must
notify the appropriate board of county commissioners and the state tax
commission of the entity's failure to comply with the provisions of this
section. Upon receipt of such notification, the board of county commis-
sioners must place a public notice in a newspaper of general circulation
in the county indicating that the entity is noncompliant with the legal
reporting requirements of this section. The county commissioners shall
assess to the entity the cost of the public notice. Such costs may be
deducted from any distributions of taxes, fees, increment financing, or
assessments collected by the county on behalf of the local governmental
entity. For any noncomplying entity, the state controller must notify
the board of county commissioners and the state tax commission of the
compliance status of such entity once the entity is in compliance.
(c) A local governmental entity that fails to comply with this section
is prohibited from including in its budget any budget increase other-
wise permitted by subsection (1)(a) or (e) of section 63-802, Idaho
Code.
(d) In addition to any other penalty provided in this section, during
any failure to comply with this section, the state tax commission must
withhold the quarterly distribution of sales tax distribution pursuant
to section 63-3638(10), Idaho Code, for any noncomplying entity. The
state tax commission must withhold and retain such money in a reserve
account until the state controller certifies that the entity has com-
plied with the provisions of this section, at which point the state tax
commission must pay any money owed to the local governmental entity pre-
viously in violation of this section.
(e) For any local governmental entity that is a non-taxing district,
including entities established pursuant to title 50, Idaho Code,
upon notification to the board of county commissioners from the state
controller of noncompliance by such entity, the board of county com-
missioners must convene to determine appropriate compliance measures,
including but not limited to the following:
(i) Require a meeting of the board of county commissioners and the
entity's governing body wherein the board of county commissioners
requires compliance of this section by the entity;


(ii) Assess a noncompliance fee on the noncomplying entity. Such
fee may not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). Such fees and
costs may be deducted from any distributions of taxes, fees, in-
crement financing, or assessments collected by the county on be-
half of the local governmental entity until such time as the entity
is in compliance with the requirements of this section and section
67-1075, Idaho Code. The amount of any such fee may not be passed
on to persons subject to the jurisdiction of the entity in the form
of adjustments to any fee or assessment imposed or collected by the
entity. Any fee collected must be deposited into the county's cur-
rent expense fund; and
(iii) Cause a special audit to be conducted on the entity at the
cost of the entity.
(8) The provisions of this section have no impact or effect upon report-
ing requirements for local governmental entities relating to the state tax
commission.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.